District of Columbia statutes.
16-2318

Order of adjudication noncriminal.

A consent decree, order of adjudication, or order of disposition in a proceeding under this subchapter is not a conviction of crime and does not impose any civil disability ordinarily resulting from a conviction, except the revocation of a motor vehicle operator’s permit or privilege in accordance with [§ 50-1403.02], nor does it operate to disqualify a child in any future civil service examination, appointment or application for public service examination, or appointment or application for public service in either the Government of the United States or of the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 534, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-222, § 3, 36 DCR 570
1981 Ed., § 16-2318.
1973 Ed., § 16-2318.